California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(m) For purposes of this section, “person” means the feepayer, a member of the feepayer’s family, a corporation, agent, fiduciary, or representative of, or another individual or entity acting on behalf of, the feepayer, or another corporation or entity owned or controlled by the feepayer, directly or indirectly, or that owns or controls the feepayer, directly or indirectly.

(n) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 272, Sec. 16) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 108.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

55333.

(a) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall release any levy or notice to withhold issued pursuant to this part on any property in the event that the expense of the sale process exceeds the liability for which the levy is made.

(b) (1) (A) The Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate may order the
 release of any levy or notice to withhold upon his or her finding that the levy or notice to withhold issued pursuant to this part or, within 90 days from the receipt of funds pursuant to a levy or notice to withhold, order the return of any amount up to two thousand three hundred dollars ($2,300) of moneys received, threatens the health or welfare of the taxpayer or his or her spouse and dependents or family.

(B) The amount the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate may return to each taxpayer subject to a levy or notice to withhold, is limited to two thousand three hundred dollars ($2,300), or the adjusted amount as specified in paragraph (2), in any monthly period.

(C) The Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate may order amounts returned in the case of a seizure of property as a result of a jeopardy determination, subject to the amounts set or adjusted pursuant to this section and if the ultimate
 collection of the amount due is no longer in jeopardy.

(2) (A) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall adjust the two-thousand-three-hundred-dollar ($2,300) amount specified in paragraph (1) as follows:

(i) On or before March 1, 2016, and on or before March 1 each year thereafter, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall multiply the amount applicable for the current fiscal year by the inflation factor adjustment calculated based on the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index, as recorded by the California Department of Industrial Relations for the most recent year available, and the formula set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 17041. The resulting amount will be the applicable amount for the succeeding fiscal year only when the applicable amount computed is equal to or exceeds a new
 operative threshold, as defined in subparagraph (B).

(ii) When the applicable amount equals or exceeds an operative threshold specified in subparagraph (B), the resulting applicable amount, rounded to the nearest multiple of one hundred dollars ($100), shall be operative for purposes of paragraph (1) beginning July 1 of the succeeding fiscal year.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “operative threshold” means an amount that exceeds by at least one hundred dollars ($100) the greater of either the amount specified in paragraph (1) or the amount computed pursuant to subparagraph (A) as the operative adjustment to the amount specified in paragraph (1).

(c) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall not sell any seized property until it has first notified the taxpayer in writing of the exemptions from
 levy under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 703.010) of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(d) Except as provided in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), this section shall not apply to the seizure of any property as a result of a jeopardy determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 181, Sec. 11.   (SB 1507)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

55333.5.

(a) Except in any case where the board finds collection of the fee to be in jeopardy, if any property has been levied upon, the property or the proceeds from the sale of the property shall be returned to the fee payer if the board determines any one of the following:

(1) The levy on the property was not in accordance with the law.

(2) The fee payer has entered into and is in compliance with an installment
 payment agreement pursuant to Section 55209 to satisfy the fee liability for which the levy was imposed, unless that or another agreement allows for the levy.

(3) The return of the property will facilitate the collection of the fee liability or will be in the best interest of the state and the fee payer.

(b) Property returned under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) is subject to the provisions of Section 55335.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 929, Sec. 79.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

55334.

Exemptions from levy under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 703.010) of Title 9 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall be adjusted for purposes of enforcing the collection of debts under this part to reflect changes in the California Consumer Price Index whenever the change is more than 5 percent higher than any previous adjustment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

55335.

(a) A taxpayer may file a claim with the board for reimbursement of bank charges and any other reasonable third-party check charge fees incurred by the taxpayer as the direct result of an erroneous levy or notice to withhold, erroneous processing action, or erroneous collection action by the board. Bank and third-party charges include a financial institution’s or third party’s customary charge for
 complying with the levy or notice to withhold instructions and reasonable charges for overdrafts that are a direct consequence of the erroneous levy or notice to withhold, erroneous processing action, or erroneous collection action. The charges are those paid by the taxpayer and not waived or reimbursed by the financial institution or third party. Each claimant applying for reimbursement shall file a claim with the board that shall be in a form as may be prescribed by the board. In order for the board to grant a claim, the board shall determine that both of the following conditions have been satisfied:

(1) The erroneous levy or notice to withhold, erroneous processing action, or erroneous collection action was caused by board error.

(2) Prior to the erroneous levy or notice to withhold, erroneous processing action, or erroneous collection action, the taxpayer responded to all
 contacts by the board and provided the board with any requested information or documentation sufficient to establish the taxpayer’s position. This provision may be waived by the board for reasonable cause.

(b) Claims pursuant to this section shall be filed within 90 days from the date the bank and third-party charges were incurred by the taxpayer. Within 30 days from the date the claim is received, the board shall respond to the claim. If the board denies the claim, the taxpayer shall be notified in writing of the reason or reasons for the denial of the claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 253, Sec. 11.   (SB 442)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

55336.

(a) At least 30 days prior to the filing or recording of liens under Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 7150) or Chapter 14.5 (commencing with Section 7220) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the department shall mail to the taxpayer a preliminary notice. The notice shall specify the statutory authority of the department for filing or recording the lien, indicate the earliest date on which the lien may be filed or recorded, and state the remedies available to the taxpayer to prevent the filing or recording of the lien. In the event tax liens are filed for the same liability in multiple counties, only one preliminary notice shall be sent.

(b) The preliminary notice required by this section shall not apply to
 jeopardy determinations issued under Article 4 (commencing with Section 55101) of Chapter 3.

(c) If the department determines that filing a lien was in error, it shall mail a release to the taxpayer and the entity recording the lien as soon as possible, but not later than seven days, after this determination and receipt of lien recording information. The release shall contain a statement that the lien was filed in error. In the event the erroneous lien is obstructing a lawful transaction, the department shall immediately issue a release of lien to the taxpayer and the entity recording the lien.

(d) When the department releases a lien erroneously filed, notice of that fact shall be mailed to the taxpayer and, upon the request of the taxpayer, a copy of the release shall be mailed to the major credit reporting companies in the county where the lien was filed.

(e) (1) The department may release or subordinate a lien if the department determines any of the following:

(A) Release or subordination will facilitate the collection of the tax liability.

(B) Release or subordination will be in the best interest of the state and the taxpayer.

(C) Release or subordination will be in the best interest of the state and another person that is not the taxpayer but that holds an interest with the taxpayer in the property that is subject to the lien.

(2) The amendments added to this subdivision do not constitute a change in, and are declaratory of, existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 109.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

55337.

(a) If any officer or employee of the board recklessly disregards board-published procedures, a taxpayer aggrieved by that action or omission may bring an action for damages against the State of California in superior court.

(b) In any action brought under subdivision (a), upon finding of liability on the part of the State of California, the state shall be liable to the plaintiff in an amount equal to the sum of all of the following:

(1) Actual and direct monetary damages sustained by the plaintiff as a result of the actions or omissions.

(2) Reasonable litigation costs, including any of the following:

(A) Reasonable court costs.

(B) Prevailing market rates for the kind or quality of services furnished in connection with any of the following:

(i) The reasonable expenses of expert witnesses in connection with the civil proceedings, except that no expert witness shall be compensated at a rate in excess of the highest rate of compensation for expert witnesses paid by the State of California.

(ii) The reasonable cost of any study, analysis, engineering report,
 test, or project that is found by the court to be necessary for the preparation of the party’s case.

(iii) Reasonable fees paid or incurred for the services of attorneys in connection with the civil proceeding, except that those fees shall not be in excess of seventy-five dollars ($75) per hour unless the court determines that an increase in the cost of living or a special factor, such as the limited availability of qualified attorneys for the proceeding, justifies a higher rate.

(c) In the awarding of damages under subdivision (b), the court shall take into consideration the negligence or omissions, if any, on the part of the plaintiff which contributed to the damages.

(d) Whenever it appears to the court that the taxpayer’s position in the proceeding brought under subdivision (a) is frivolous, the court may impose
 a penalty against the plaintiff in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000). A penalty so imposed shall be paid upon notice and demand from the board and shall be collected as a tax imposed under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 335.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Violations [55361. - 55365.]

55361.

Any person who refuses to furnish any return or report required to be made, or who refuses to furnish a supplemental return or other data required by the board, is guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

55362.

Any person who knowingly or willfully files a false return or report with the board, and any person who refuses to permit the board or any of its authorized representatives to make any inspection or examination for which provision is made in this part, or who fails to keep any records prescribed by the board, or who fails to preserve the records for the inspection of the board for the time that the board deems necessary, or who alters, cancels, or obliterates entries in the records for the purpose of falsifying the records, is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be
 punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) or more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than one month or more than six months, or by both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

55363.

Any person who willfully evades or attempts in any manner to evade or defeat the payment of the fee imposed by this part is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months, two, or three years and a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 594.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

55363.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, any person who purchases, installs, or uses in this state any automated sales suppression device or zapper or phantom-ware with the intent to defeat or evade the determination of an amount collected pursuant to this part is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) (1) Any person who, for commercial gain, sells, purchases, installs,
 transfers, or possesses in this state any automated sales suppression device or zapper or phantom-ware with the knowledge that the sole purpose of the device is to defeat or evade the determination of an amount collected pursuant to this part is guilty of an offense punishable by a fine as specified in paragraph (2), by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or, pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, for 16 months, or two or three years, or by both that fine and imprisonment. In addition, any person who uses an automated sales suppression device or zapper or phantom-ware shall be liable for all taxes, interest, and penalties due as a result of the use of that device.

(2) (A) Where a person is guilty of the offense described in paragraph (1) and the person sold, installed, transferred, or possessed three or fewer automated sales suppression devices or zappers or phantom-ware, that
 person shall be guilty of an offense punishable by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(B) Where a person is guilty of the offense described in paragraph (1) and the person sold, installed, transferred, or possessed more than three automated sales suppression devices or zappers or phantom-ware, that person shall be guilty of an offense punishable by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(3) This subdivision shall not apply to a person that is a corporation that possesses any automated sales suppression device or zapper or phantom-ware for the sole purpose of developing hardware or software to combat the evasion of taxes by use of automated sales suppression devices or zappers or phantom-ware.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Automated sales suppression device” or “zapper” means a software program carried on a memory stick or removable compact disc, accessed through an Internet link, or accessed through any other means, that falsifies the electronic records of electronic cash registers and other point-of-sale systems, including, but not limited to, transaction data and transaction reports.

(2) “Electronic cash register” means a device that keeps a register or supporting documents through the means of an electronic device or computer system designed to record transaction data for the purpose of computing, compiling, or processing retail sales transaction data in whatever manner.

(3) “Phantom-ware” means a hidden, preinstalled, or installed at a later time programming option embedded in the operating system of an electronic cash register or hardwired into the electronic cash register
 that can be used to create a virtual second till or may eliminate or manipulate transaction records that may or may not be preserved in digital formats to represent the true or manipulated record of transactions in the electronic cash register.

(4) “Transaction data” includes information regarding items purchased by a customer, the price for each item, a taxability determination for each item, a segregated tax or fee amount for each of the items subject to the tax or fee, the amount of cash or credit tendered, the net amount returned to the customer in change, the date and time of the purchase, the name, address, and identification number of the vendor, and the receipt or invoice number of the transaction. 

(d) This section shall not preclude prosecution under any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 532, Sec. 2.   (AB 781)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

55364.

Every person convicted for a violation of any provision of this part for which another penalty or punishment is not specifically provided for in this part is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

55365.

Any prosecution for violation of any provision of this part shall be instituted within three years after the commission of the offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Disclosure of Information [55381. - 55381.]

55381.

(a) If the department collects a fee pursuant to this part on behalf of a state agency or pursuant to an interagency agreement with a state agency, or if the fee collected pursuant to this part is used to fund a program administered by a state agency, the department shall provide that state agency with any and all information obtained under this part relating to that fee.

(b) It shall be unlawful for the department, the state agency for which the department collects the fee, or any person having an administrative duty under this part to make known, in any manner whatsoever, the business affairs, operations, or any other information pertaining to a feepayer that was submitted to the department in a report or return required by this part, or to permit any report
 or copy thereof to be seen or examined by any person not expressly authorized by subdivision (a) and this subdivision. However, the Governor may, by general or special order, authorize examination of the records maintained by the department under this part by other state officers, by officers of another state, by the federal government, if a reciprocal arrangement exists, or by any other person. The information so obtained pursuant to the order of the Governor shall not be made public except to the extent and in the manner that the order may authorize that it be made public.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the predecessors, successors, receivers, trustees, executors, administrators, assignees, and guarantors of a feepayer, if directly interested, may be given information regarding the determination of any unpaid fees or the amount of
 the fees, interest, or penalties required to be collected or assessed.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), information regarding the determination of any unpaid fees or the amount of the fees, interest, or penalties required to be collected or assessed may be disclosed to any agent of a vessel owner or operator subject to the fees imposed by Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 71215) of Division 36 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 511, Sec. 38.   (SB 889)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 31. DIESEL FUEL TAX LAW [60001. - 60709.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [60001. - 60049.1.]

60001.

This part is known and may be cited as the “Diesel Fuel Tax Law.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60003.

“Terminal” means a diesel fuel storage and distribution facility that is supplied by pipeline or vessel, and from which diesel fuel may be removed at a rack. “Terminal” includes a fuel production facility where diesel fuel is produced and stored and from which diesel fuel may be removed at a rack.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 545, Sec. 6.   (AB 1547)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

60003.1.

“Fuel production facility” means a facility, other than a refinery, in which diesel fuel is produced.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 545, Sec. 7.   (AB 1547)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

60004.

“Refinery” means a facility used to produce diesel fuel from crude oil, unfinished oils, natural gas liquids, or other hydrocarbons and from which diesel fuel may be removed by pipeline, by vessel, or at a rack.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60005.

“Approved terminal or refinery” means a terminal or refinery that is operated, respectively, by a diesel fuel registrant that is a terminal operator, or by a diesel fuel registrant that is a refiner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60006.

“Rack” means a mechanism for delivering diesel fuel from a refinery or terminal into a truck, trailer, railroad car, or other means of nonbulk transfer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60007.

“Removal” means any physical transfer of diesel fuel, and any use of diesel fuel other than as a material in the production of diesel fuel. However, diesel fuel is not removed when it evaporates or is otherwise lost or destroyed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60008.

“Person” includes any individual, firm, partnership, joint venture, limited liability company, association, corporation, estate, trust, business trust, receiver, syndicate, this state, any county, city and county, municipality, district, or other political subdivision thereof, or any other group or combination acting as a unit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 497, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

60009.

“Terminal operator” includes any person that owns, operates, or otherwise controls a terminal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60010.

“Position holder” includes any person that holds the inventory position in the diesel fuel, as reflected on the records of the terminal operator. A person holds the inventory position in diesel fuel when that person has a contractual agreement with the terminal operator for the use of storage facilities and terminaling services at a terminal with respect to the diesel fuel. “Position holder” includes a terminal operator that owns diesel fuel in its terminal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60011.

“Refiner” includes any person that owns, operates, or otherwise controls a refinery.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60012.

“Blender” includes any person that produces or converts blended diesel fuel outside the bulk transfer/terminal system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 50.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

60013.

“Enterer” includes any person who is the importer of record (under federal customs law) with respect to diesel fuel. If the importer of record is acting as an agent, the person for whom the agent is acting is the enterer. If there is no importer of record of diesel fuel entered into this state, the owner of the diesel fuel at the time it is brought into this state is the enterer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60014.

“Board” or “department” means the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 118.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

60015.

“Diesel fuel registrant” includes any enterer, positionholder, refiner, throughputter, or terminal operator, that is licensed as a supplier pursuant to Section 60131.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 38.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

60016.

“Highway” includes any way or place, of whatever nature, that is publicly maintained and open to the use of the public for purposes of vehicular travel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60017.

“In this state” or “in the state” means within the exterior limits of the State of California and includes all territory within these limits owned by or ceded to the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60018.

“Fuel tank” means any receptacle on a motor vehicle from which fuel is supplied for the operation of the motor vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60019.

“Motor vehicle” includes every self-propelled vehicle operated or suitable for operation on the highway, except a vehicle used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60021.

“Entry” means the importing of diesel fuel into this state. However, diesel fuel brought into this state in the fuel tank of a motor vehicle shall not be deemed to be an “entry” if not removed from the fuel tank except as used for the operation of that motor vehicle, except to the extent that diesel fuel was acquired tax free for export or a refund of tax was claimed as a result of exportation from the state from which that diesel fuel was transported into this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60022.

(a) “Diesel fuel” means any liquid that is commonly or commercially known or sold as a fuel that is suitable for use in a diesel-powered highway vehicle. A liquid meets this requirement if, without further processing or blending, the liquid has practical and commercial fitness for use in the engine of a diesel-powered highway vehicle.

However, a liquid does not possess this practical and commercial fitness solely by reason of its possible or rare use as a fuel in the
 engine of a diesel-powered highway vehicle.

“Diesel fuel” does not include kerosene, gasoline, liquified petroleum gas, natural gas in liquid or gaseous form, or alcohol.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2007.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2001, 2nd Ex., Ch. 8) by Stats. 2003, Ch. 605, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Section operative January 1, 2007, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

60023.

(a) “Blended diesel fuel” means any mixture of diesel fuel with respect to which tax has been imposed and any other liquid (such as kerosene) on which tax has not been imposed (other than diesel fuel dyed in accordance with United States Environmental Protection Agency or Internal Revenue Service rules). Blended diesel fuel also means any conversion of a liquid into diesel fuel. “Conversion of a liquid into diesel fuel” occurs when any
 liquid that is not included in the definition of diesel fuel and that is outside the bulk transfer/terminal system is sold as diesel fuel, delivered as diesel fuel, or represented to be diesel fuel.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2007.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 4) and added by Stats. 2001, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 8, Sec. 5.   Effective October 3, 2001.   Section operative January 1, 2007, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

60024.

“Colorless marker” means material that does not reveal its presence until the diesel fuel into which it is introduced is subjected to a special test.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60025.

“Gallon” means the United States gallon of 231 cubic inches or the volumetric gallon adjusted to 60 degrees Fahrenheit when the invoice and settlement are made on the temperature corrected gallonage.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 40.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

60026.

“Diesel-powered highway vehicle” means a motor vehicle that is operated by a diesel-powered engine on a highway.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60027.

“Qualified highway vehicle operator” means any person licensed as a qualified highway vehicle operator that owns, operates, or otherwise controls a diesel-powered highway vehicle and delivers, or causes to be delivered, diesel fuel or any liquid into the fuel tank of a diesel-powered highway vehicle and is qualified to use dyed diesel fuel on the highway by the Internal Revenue Service under Section 48.4082-4 of Title 26 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 41.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

60029.

“Bulk transfer” means any transfer of diesel fuel by pipeline or vessel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60030.

“Bulk transfer/terminal system” means the diesel fuel distribution system consisting of refineries, pipelines, vessels, and terminals. Diesel fuel in a refinery, pipeline, vessel, or terminal is in the bulk transfer/terminal system. Diesel fuel in the fuel tank of any engine, or in any railcar, trailer, truck, or other equipment suitable for ground transportation is not in the bulk transfer/terminal system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60031.

“Dyed diesel fuel” means diesel fuel that is dyed under United States Environmental Protection Agency or the Internal Revenue Service rules for high sulphur diesel fuel or low sulphur diesel fuel or any other requirements subsequently set by the United States Environmental Protection Agency or the Internal Revenue Service and considered destined for nontaxable, off-highway uses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60032.

“Undyed diesel fuel” means diesel fuel that is not subject to the United States Environmental Protection Agency or Internal Revenue Service diesel fuel dyeing requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60033.

“Supplier” includes any person who is any of the following:

(a) Blender, as defined in Section 60012.

(b) Enterer, as defined in Section 60013.

(c) Position holder, as defined in Section 60010.

(d) Refiner, as defined in Section 60011.

(e) Terminal operator, as defined in Section 60009.

(f) Throughputter, as defined in Section 60035.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60034.

“Highway vehicle operator/fueler” includes:

(a) Any person, other than a qualified highway vehicle operator, that owns, operates, or otherwise controls a diesel-powered highway vehicle and delivers, or causes to be delivered, diesel fuel or any liquid into the fuel tank of a diesel-powered highway vehicle; or

(b) Any person who sells diesel fuel on which a claim for refund has been allowed, or who sells
 and delivers or causes to be delivered in the fuel tank of a diesel-powered highway vehicle dyed diesel fuel or any liquid on which tax has not been imposed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 42.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

60035.

“Throughputter” means any person that owns diesel fuel within the bulk transfer/terminal system (other than in a terminal) or is a position holder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60036.

“Ultimate vendor” means a person that sells undyed diesel fuel to the user of the diesel fuel (the ultimate purchaser) for use on a farm for farming purposes or for use in an exempt bus operation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60037.

“Ultimate purchaser” means a person that uses diesel fuel for use on a farm for farming purposes or an exempt bus operator that uses diesel fuel in an exempt bus operation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60038.

“Registered ultimate vendor” means a person that is licensed as an ultimate vendor pursuant to Section 60151.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60039.

(a) “Exempt bus operation” consists of the following:

(1) Any transit district, transit authority, city, or county owning and operating a local transit system itself or through a wholly owned nonprofit corporation.

(2) Any private entity providing transportation services for the transportation of people under contract or agreement, except general franchise agreements, with a public agency authorized to provide public transportation services, only for diesel fuel consumed while providing services under those contracts or agreements entered into subsequent to January 1, 1979.

(3) Any passenger stage corporation subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Utilities Commission when the motor vehicles of the passenger stage corporation are exclusively operated in urban or suburban areas or between cities in close proximity for the transportation of persons for hire, compensation, or profit. However, the exemption is not extended to any line or lines operated by the passenger stage corporation that exceed 50 miles of one-way route mileage.

(4) Any common carrier of passengers operating exclusively on any line or lines within the limits of a single city between fixed termini or over a regular route, 98 percent of whose operations, as measured by total route mileage operated, are exclusively within the limits of a single city, and who by reason thereof is not a passenger stage corporation subject to the
 jurisdiction of the Public Utilities Commission.

(5) Any school district, community college district, or county superintendent of schools owning, leasing, or operating buses for the purpose of transporting pupils to and from school and for other school or college activities involving pupils, including, but not limited to, field trips and athletic contests.

(6) Any private entity providing transportation services for the purposes specified in paragraph (5) under contract or agreement with a school district, community college district, or county superintendent of schools, only for diesel fuel consumed while providing services under those contracts or agreements entered into subsequent to September 30, 1984.

(b) “Exempt bus operation” as defined in subdivision (a), shall not be applicable to a charter-party carrier of passengers. The term “charter-party carrier of passengers” has the same meaning as that specified in Section 5360 of the Public Utilities Code and shall further include those transportation services described in subdivisions (a) and (e) of Section 5353 of the Public Utilities Code, if that transportation service is rendered as contract carriage and not as common carriage of passengers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 217, Sec. 2.   (SB 359)   Effective October 1, 2025.   Operative on the date prescribed by Sec. 3 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 217.)
-------------------------------------------

60040.

“Exempt bus operator” includes any person that owns, operates, or controls an exempt bus operation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60041.
